Colorado, session 2026A, SB165.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Section 24-33-111 (2), Colorado Revised Statutes, creates the
species conservation trust fund in the state treasury to fund programs
designed to conserve native species that have been listed as threatened or
endangered under state or federal law or that are candidate species or are
likely to become candidate species, as determined by the United States fish
and wildlife service; and
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(b) Pursuant to section 24-33-111 (3), Colorado Revised Statutes:
(I) The executive director of the department of natural resources,
after consulting with the Colorado water conservation board, the parks and
wildlife commission, and the director of the division of parks and wildlife,
has prepared and delivered to the general assembly a species conservation
eligibility list describing programs and associated costs that are eligible to
receive funding from the species conservation trust fund; and
(II) The species conservation eligibility list is subject to
modification and adoption through the passage of this Senate Bill 26-165,
enacted in 2026.
SECTION 2. Eligibility list - approval. (1) The general assembly
deems the recommended expenditures described in the species conservation
eligibility list to be in the interest of the people of the state. The money
specified in this subsection (1) is available in state fiscal year 2026-27 and
remains available for the designated purposes until it is fully expended.
Species conservation trust fund money made available for native terrestrial
wildlife conservation pursuant to subsection (1)(d) of this section is not
available for purposes of importing new wolves for reintroduction into the
state for state fiscal year 2026-27. The executive director of the department
of natural resources is authorized to obligate and expend five million dollars
($5,000,000) from the species conservation trust fund created in section
24-33-111 (2), Colorado Revised Statutes, for the following activities,
programs, and species in the following amounts:
PROGRAM/SPECIES AMOUNT
(a) Upper Colorado river
endangered fish recovery
program and San Juan river basin
recovery implementation program; $2,380,000
(b) Rio Grande native fish
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-165

protection and habitat improvements; $60,000
(c) Selenium management, research,
monitoring, evaluation,
and control; $60,000
(d) Native terrestrial
wildlife conservation; $1,250,000
(e) Native aquatic
wildlife conservation. $1,250,000
Total authorization $5,000,000
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-165

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-165